Maryland, session 2025, HB0803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION” INCLUDES:
(I) A VISUAL REPRESENTATION CREATED WITHOUT USING
OTHER EXISTING VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OF A PERSON; AND
(II) A VISUAL REPRESENTATION CREATED USING OTHER
EXISTING VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OF A PERSON WITHOUT THE PERSON’S
CONSENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0803*

HOUSE BILL 803
(3) “Distribute” means to give, sell, transfer, disseminate, publish, upload,
circulate, broadcast, make available, allow access to, or engage in any other form of
transmission, electronic or otherwise.
[(3)] (4) “Harm” means:
(i) physical injury;
(ii) serious emotional distress; or
(iii) economic damages.
(5) (I) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON” MEANS THAT AN ORDINARY PERSON WOULD CONCLUDE
THAT THE VISUAL REPRESENTATION IS OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(II) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON” INCLUDES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION THAT HAS BEEN CREATED, ADAPTED, OR MODIFIED TO APPEAR
AS AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(III) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON” DOES NOT INCLUDE VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OR ITEMS
DEPICTING A PERSON THAT ARE:
1. DRAWINGS;
2. CARTOONS;
3. SCULPTURES; OR
4. PAINTINGS.
[(4)] (6) “Intimate parts” means the naked genitals, pubic area, buttocks,
or female nipple.
[(5)] (7) “Sexual activity” means:
(i) sexual intercourse, including genital–genital, oral–genital,
anal–genital, or oral–anal;
(ii) masturbation; or
(iii) sadomasochistic abuse.

HOUSE BILL 803 3
(b) (1) This section does not apply to:
(i) lawful and common practices of law enforcement, the reporting
of unlawful conduct, or legal proceedings; or
(ii) situations involving voluntary exposure in public or commercial
settings.
(2) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), is
not liable under this section for content provided by another person.
(c) (1) A person may not knowingly distribute a visual representation of
another identifiable person that displays the other person with his or her intimate parts
exposed or while engaged in an act of sexual activity:
[(1)] (I) with the intent to harm, harass, intimidate, threaten, or coerce
the other person;
[(2) (i)] (II) 1. under circumstances in which the person knew that
the other person did not consent to the distribution; or
[(ii)] 2. with reckless disregard as to whether the person
consented to the distribution; and
[(3)] (III) under circumstances in which the other person had a reasonable
expectation that the image would remain private.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY DISTRIBUTE A
COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT IS INDISTINGUISHABLE
FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON THAT DISPLAYS THE OTHER
PERSON WITH HIS OR HER INTIMATE PARTS EXPOSED OR WHILE ENGAGED IN AN ACT
OF SEXUAL ACTIVITY:
(I) WITH THE INTENT TO HARM, HARASS, INTIMIDATE,
THREATEN, OR COERCE THE OTHER PERSON; AND
(II) 1. UNDER CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH THE PERSON
KNEW THAT THE OTHER PERSON DID NOT CONSENT TO THE DISTRIBUTION; OR
2. WITH RECKLESS DISREGARD AS TO WHETHER THE
PERSON CONSENTED TO THE DISTRIBUTION.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 2 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.

HOUSE BILL 803
(e) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
(f) A visual representation AND A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION of a victim that is part of a court record for a case arising from a
prosecution under this section:
(1) subject to item (2) of this subsection, may not be made available for
public inspection; and
(2) except as otherwise ordered by the court, may only be made available
for inspection in relation to a criminal charge under this section to:
(i) court personnel;
(ii) a jury in a criminal case brought under this section;
(iii) the State’s Attorney or the State’s Attorney’s designee;
(iv) the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee;
(v) a law enforcement officer;
(vi) the defendant or the defendant’s attorney; or
(vii) the victim or the victim’s attorney.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.